West Virginia, session 2026, HB4077.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: Article 2. State Board of Education. §18-2-47. Removal of standardized testing in schools. (a) The State Board of Education shall cease the administration of all standardized tests and testing in public and private schools.(b) This section shall become effective for the 2026-2027 school year and for every school year thereafter.